Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.180

Preplacement report required before placement with adoptive parents—Exception.

Except as provided in RCW 26.33.220, a child shall not be placed with prospective adoptive parents until a preplacement report has been filed with the court.

[ 1984 c 155 s 18.]